Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-701.02
Changes to act; operative; when.

Any changes made to the Judges Retirement Act affecting retirement benefits shall be so interpreted as to effectuate their general purpose to provide, in the public interest, adequate retirement benefits for judges and to permit a change in such retirement benefits as soon as the same may become operative under the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 9.